Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-649
Private road or driveway, defined.

Private road or driveway shall mean every way or place in private ownership and used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner but not by other persons.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 145.

A residential driveway is not private property that is open to public access. Thus, criminal liability under section 60-6,196 does not extend to intoxicated persons in control of a vehicle parked on a residential driveway, regardless of whether part of the vehicle crosses a sidewalk. State v. McCave, 282 Neb. 500, 805 N.W.2d 290 (2011).